Idaho, session 2026, S1304.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-1102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1102. OWNERS OF LAND -- RIGHT TO RIGHT-OF-WAY. (1) Owners or
claimants to land that do not have sufficient length of frontage on a stream
to afford the requisite fall for a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or other
conduit on their own premises for the proper irrigation or drainage thereof,
or where the land proposed to be irrigated is back from the banks of such
stream, and convenient facilities otherwise for the watering of said lands
cannot be had, such owners or claimants are entitled to a right-of-way
through the lands of others for a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit to
convey water to the place of use for the purposes of irrigation or to provide
drainage of irrigated land.
(2) The right-of-way for a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or other con-
duit shall include but is not limited to the reasonable exercise of the fol-
lowing rights:
(a) The right to enter the land across which the right-of-way extends
for the purposes of accessing, inspecting, operating, cleaning, main-
taining, and repairing the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, conduit,
embankments, and irrigation structures and to occupy such width of the
land along the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, conduit, and embankments
as is necessary to properly perform such work with personnel and with
such equipment as is commonly used or is reasonably adapted to that
work.


(b) The right to remove from the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, conduit,
embankments, and irrigation structures the debris, soil, vegetation,
and other material the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit owner
or operator reasonably deems necessary to properly access, inspect, op-
erate, clean, maintain, and repair them. The owner or operator has the
right and discretion to transport the material from the right-of-way,
to utilize the material for reconstruction, repair, or maintenance of
the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, conduit, embankments, irrigation
structures, and related roads and access areas, and to deposit and leave
the material within the right-of-way, provided that the deposits occupy
no greater width of land along the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, con-
duit, and embankments than is reasonably necessary.
(c) The right to occupy the right-of-way during any season of the year
to perform the work of operating, cleaning, maintaining, and repair-
ing the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, conduit, embankments, and irri-
gation structures without prior notice to the owner or occupant of the
land across which the right-of-way extends.
(d) The right to construct, install, modify, maintain, or relocate any
structure, headgate, siphon, measuring device, road, fence, gate, or
other appurtenance within the right-of-way that facilitates the deliv-
ery or drainage of water or is used to access, protect, inspect, oper-
ate, clean, maintain, or repair the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or
other conduit.
(d) (e) The owner or operator of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or
conduit is not obligated to maintain or control the right-of-way or veg-
etation for the benefit of the owners or claimants of lands of others.
(f) A servient estate owner's permission shall not be required to exer-
cise the rights described in this section.
(3) Any servient estate owner shall be deemed to have notice that the
owner of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit has the right-of-way
and all incidental rights confirmed or granted by this section if:
(a) The servient estate owner has actual or constructive knowledge of
the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit; or
(b) The ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit or any feature thereof
is visible or reasonably discoverable.
(4) Rights-of-way provided by this section are essential for the op-
erations of the ditches, canals, laterals, drains, and conduits. No person
or entity shall cause or permit any encroachments onto the right-of-way,
including public or private roads, utilities, fences, gates, pipelines,
structures, landscaping, trees, vegetation, or other construction or place-
ment of objects, without the written permission of the owner or operator
of the right-of-way in order to ensure that any such encroachments will
not unreasonably or materially interfere with the use and enjoyment of the
right-of-way. Such written permission shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(5) Encroachments of any kind placed in such right-of-way without ex-
press written permission of the owner or operator of the right-of-way shall
be removed at the expense of the person or entity causing or permitting such
encroachment, upon the request of the owner or operator of the right-of-way,
in the event that any such encroachments unreasonably or materially inter-
fere with the use and enjoyment of the right-of-way.


(a) The person or entity that caused or permitted the encroachment
shall perform such removal, modification, repair, or restoration
within a reasonable time after request from the owner or operator of the
easement or right-of-way or immediately upon such request in the event
of reduced delivery or drainage of water, property damage, safety risk,
or other emergency. What constitutes a reasonable time to respond to
the request depends on the circumstances affecting the use, operation,
maintenance, and repair of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or conduit
and associated easement or right-of-way.
(b) If the person or entity that caused or permitted the encroachment
fails to timely perform the requested actions, or in the event of re-
duced delivery or drainage of water, property damage, safety risk, or
other emergency, the owner or operator of the easement or right-of-way
may proceed to perform such actions at the expense of the person or en-
tity causing or permitting the encroachment, as long as no work is per-
formed on any municipal or public utility line.
(6) Any person or entity that causes or permits an encroachment shall
be responsible for its use, operation, maintenance, repair, and replace-
ment to prevent unreasonable or material interference with the ditch, canal,
lateral, drain, or conduit and the associated easement or right-of-way and
shall be liable for all damages that may accrue therefrom.
(7) Nothing in this section shall in any way affect the exercise of the
right of eminent domain for the public purposes set forth in section 7-701,
Idaho Code.
(8) This section shall apply to ditches, canals, laterals, drains,
conduits, and embankments existing on the effective date of this act, as
well as to ditches, canals, laterals, drains, conduits, and embankments
constructed or existing after such effective date.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 12, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1201, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1201. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, "irrigation conduit"
means a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, pipeline, or other surface channel or
buried conduit that is used to convey water to the place of use for the pur-
poses of irrigation or to provide drainage of irrigated land.
SECTION 3. That Section 42-1201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1201 42-1202. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF IRRIGATION CONVEYANCE
FACILITIES. (1) Every person or entity owning or controlling any ditch,
canal, lateral, or irrigation conduit for the purpose of irrigation shall:
(a) During the time the ditch, canal, lateral, or irrigation conduit is
operated to deliver water for irrigation, keep a flow of water therein
sufficient to meet the needs of the persons or entities entitled to the
use of water therefrom. Such duty may be adjusted when there is insuffi-
cient water in the public streams or other natural water sources or when
the board of directors or governing body of an entity furnishing water


deems it in the best interests of that entity to reduce the water supply
or dates of availability;
(b) Construct the necessary outlets in the ditch, canal, lateral, or
irrigation conduit for proper delivery of water to persons and entities
having rights to the use of the water;
(c) Not permit a greater quantity of water to be turned into the ditch,
canal, lateral, or irrigation conduit than it will contain or than can
be used for beneficial or useful purposes to prevent the wasting and
useless discharge and running away of water; and
(d) Carefully keep and maintain the ditch, canal, lateral, or
irrigation conduit in good repair and condition so as not to damage or
in any way injure the property or premises of others and to prevent the
water conveyed therein from wasting during the irrigation season.
(2) The duties to operate and maintain an irrigation ditch, canal, lat-
eral, or conduit, whether statutory or common law, require reasonable care
only and shall not be construed to impose strict liability or to otherwise
enlarge the liability of the owners or operators thereof. The owners, con-
structors, or operators of irrigation ditches, canals, laterals, or con-
duits, while responsible for their own acts or omissions, shall not be liable
for damage or injury caused by:
(a) The diversion or discharge of water into a ditch, canal, lateral, or
irrigation conduit by a third party without the permission of the owner
or operator thereof;
(b) Any other act or omission of a third party, other than an employee
or agent of the owner or operator of the ditch, canal, lateral, or
irrigation conduit; or
(c) An act of God, including but not limited to fire, earthquake, storm,
or similar natural phenomenon.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to impair any
defense that an owner, constructor, or operator of a ditch, canal, lateral,
or irrigation conduit may assert in a civil action.
SECTION 4. That Section 42-1207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1207 42-1203. RELOCATION AND PIPING OF IRRIGATION CONVEYANCE
FACILITIES AND DRAINAGE FACILITIES. (1) Where any ditch, canal, lateral,
drain, or buried irrigation conduit has heretofore been, or may hereafter
be, constructed across or beneath the lands of another:
(a) The servient estate owner may, at his own expense, relocate or pipe
the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried irrigation conduit to any
other part of his land, but such change must be made in such a manner
as not to impede the flow of the water therein, or to otherwise injure
any person or entity using or interested in such ditch, canal, lateral,
drain, or buried irrigation conduit.; or
(b) The servient estate owner may, at his own expense, place the ditch,
canal, lateral, or drain irrigation conduit in a pipe, culvert, or other
conduit on his land, provided that the pipe, culvert, or other conduit
installation and backfill reasonably meet standard specifications for
such materials and construction, as set forth in the Idaho standards for


public works construction or other standards recognized by the city or
county in which the burying is to be done.
(2) The right and responsibility for operation and maintenance of a
ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried an irrigation conduit that is re-
located or placed in conduit by the servient estate owner shall remain with
the owner of the ditch, canal, lateral irrigation conduit, or drain, but the
servient estate owner, his heirs, executors, administrators, successors,
and assigns shall be responsible for any increased operation and maintenance
costs, including rehabilitation and replacement, unless otherwise agreed
in writing with the owner of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried
irrigation conduit.
(3)(a) The written permission of the owner or operator of a ditch,
canal, lateral, drain, or buried an irrigation conduit must first be
obtained before it is relocated or placed in a pipe, culvert, or other
conduit by the owner of the servient estate, in order to ensure that:
(i) Such change will not impede the flow of water therein, un-
reasonably or materially interfere with access, use, operation,
maintenance, cleaning, or repair, or otherwise injure any person
or entity using such ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried irri-
gation conduit;
(ii) Adequate provision is made for the payment of any increased
operation and maintenance costs, including rehabilitation and re-
placement, unless otherwise agreed in writing with the owner or
operator of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried irrigation
conduit; and
(iii) Adequate provision is made documenting, protecting, and
perpetuating the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried irri-
gation conduit right-of-way pursuant to section 42-1102, Idaho
Code.
(b) Such written permission shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(4) A ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried An irrigation conduit
that is relocated or placed in a pipe, culvert, or other conduit without
such express written permission shall be removed, modified, repaired,
or restored to its prior location or condition, as directed by the owner
thereof, at the expense of the person or entity that caused or permitted such
relocation or placement in pipe, culvert, or other conduit, in the event
it unreasonably or materially interferes with the use and enjoyment of the
easement or right-of-way.
(a) The person or entity that caused or permitted the relocation or
the placement in pipe, culvert, or other conduit shall perform such re-
moval, modification, repair, or restoration within a reasonable time
after request from the owner or operator of the easement or right-of-
way, or immediately upon such request in the event of reduced delivery
or drainage of water, property damage, safety risk, or other emergency.
What constitutes a reasonable time to respond to the request depends on
circumstances affecting the use, operation, maintenance, and repair of
the ditch, canal, lateral drain, or buried irrigation conduit and asso-
ciated easement or right-of-way.
(b) If the person or entity that caused or permitted the relocation or
the placement in pipe, culvert, or other conduit fails to timely perform


the requested actions, or in the event of reduced delivery or drainage
of water, property damage, safety risk, or other emergency, the owner
or operator of the easement or right-of-way may proceed to perform such
actions at the expense of the person or entity that caused or permitted
the relocation or piping.
(5) The owner or operator of a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried
An irrigation conduit that has been constructed across or beneath the lands
of another may relocate or pipe the facility. be relocated or piped by its
owner or operator as follows:
(a) Prior to relocating a ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried irri-
gation conduit, the written permission of the owner of the servient es-
tate shall be obtained The irrigation conduit's owner or operator shall
obtain the servient estate owner's written permission prior to relocat-
ing or piping the conduit outside of the easement or right-of-way.
(b) The irrigation conduit's owner or operator shall have the right to
relocate or pipe an irrigation conduit within the easement or right-of-
way without obtaining the servient estate owner's permission.
(b) (c) The owner or operator of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or
buried irrigation conduit an open surface channel used for irrigation
or drainage shall have the right to place it in a buried conduit within
the easement or right-of-way, without the permission of the servient
estate owner, in accordance with standard specifications for pipe,
materials, installation, and backfill, as set forth in the Idaho stan-
dards for public works construction or other standards recognized by
the city or county in which the burying is to be done, and as long as
the construction is accomplished in a manner that the surface of the
servient estate outside the easement or right-of-way and the owner's
use thereof is not disrupted and is restored to its prior condition as
expeditiously as possible, but no longer than thirty (30) days after the
completion of construction.
(c) (d) The owner of the servient estate may request that the conduit be
installed along a different route than the existing route of the ditch,
canal, lateral, or drain irrigation conduit, provided that:
(i) The conditions of subsection (3) of this section are satis-
fied; and
(ii) The servient estate owner, his heirs, executors, adminis-
trators, successors, and assigns shall be responsible for any in-
creased construction or future maintenance costs necessitated by
said relocation. Maintenance of the buried conduit shall be the
responsibility of the conduit owner or operator.
(6) This section shall apply to ditches, canals, laterals, drains, and
buried irrigation conduits existing on or established after July 1, 2024.
SECTION 5. That Section 42-1208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1208 42-1204. EASEMENTS, RIGHTS-OF-WAY, AND OTHER REAL PROPERTY
NOT SUBJECT TO ADVERSE POSSESSION. (1) The easements, rights-of-way, or
real property owned by irrigation districts, Carey act operating companies,
nonprofit irrigation entities, lateral ditch associations, and drainage
districts are not subject to adverse possession.


(2) No person shall prevent free access of authorized personnel on such
easements, rights-of-way, or other real property, or construct any obstruc-
tion on such easements, rights-of-way, or other real property in an effort to
adversely possess said easement, right-of-way, or other real property.
SECTION 6. That Section 42-1209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1209 42-1205. ENCROACHMENTS ON EASEMENTS AND RIGHTS-OF-WAY. (1)
Easements or rights-of-way operated, maintained, controlled, or owned by
irrigation districts, Carey act operating companies, nonprofit irrigation
entities, lateral ditch associations, and drainage districts are essential
for the operations of such irrigation and drainage entities. Accordingly,
no person or entity shall cause or permit any encroachments onto the ease-
ments or rights-of-way, including any public or private roads, utilities,
fences, gates, pipelines, structures, landscaping, trees, vegetation, or
other construction or placement of objects, without the written permis-
sion of the irrigation district, Carey act operating company, nonprofit
irrigation entity, lateral ditch association, or drainage district owning,
operating, maintaining, or controlling the easement or right-of-way, in
order to ensure that any such encroachments will not unreasonably or mate-
rially interfere with the use and enjoyment of the easement or right-of-way
and the incidental rights and protections described in sections 42-1102 and
42-1207 42-1203, Idaho Code. Such written permission shall not be unreason-
ably withheld.
(2) Encroachments of any kind placed in such easement or right-of-way,
without such express written permission, shall be removed or modified, and
the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, irrigation conduit, easement, or right-
of-way shall be repaired or restored at the expense of the person or entity
causing or permitting such encroachments, upon the request of the persons
operating, maintaining, or controlling the easement or right-of-way or the
owner of the easement or right-of-way, in the event that any such encroach-
ments unreasonably or materially interfere with the use and enjoyment of the
easement or right-of-way.
(a) The person or entity that caused or permitted the encroachment
shall perform such removal, modification, repair, or restoration
within a reasonable time after request from the owner or operator of
the easement or right-of-way, or immediately upon such request in the
event of reduced delivery or drainage of water, property damage, safety
risk, or other emergency. What constitutes a reasonable time to respond
to the request depends on circumstances affecting the use, operation,
maintenance, and repair of the ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or buried
irrigation conduit and associated easement or right-of-way.
(b) If the person or entity that caused or permitted the encroachment
fails to timely perform the requested actions, or in the event of re-
duced delivery or drainage of water, property damage, safety risk, or
other emergency, the owner or operator of the easement or right-of-way
may proceed to perform such actions at the expense of the person or en-
tity that caused or permitted the encroachment, as long as no work is
performed on any municipal or public utility line.


(3) Any person or entity that causes or permits an encroachment shall be
responsible for its use, operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement to
prevent unreasonable or material interference with a ditch, canal, lateral,
drain, or an irrigation conduit and the associated easement or right-of-way
and shall be liable for all damages that may accrue therefrom.
(4) Nothing in this section shall in any way affect the exercise of the
right of eminent domain for the public purposes set forth in section 7-701,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. That Section 18-4308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4308. CHANGE OF DITCH, CANAL, LATERAL, DRAIN, OR BURIED IRRIGATION
CONDUIT. Any person who relocates or places in pipe, culvert, or other con-
duit or buries a ditch, canal, lateral, or drain contrary to the provisions
of section 42-1207 42-1203, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.